Washington statutes.
RCW 35.36.050

Liability of officer.

A mayor, comptroller, or clerk authorizing the affixing of his or her signature to a bond by a proxy shall be subject to the same liability personally and on his or her bond for any signature so affixed and to the same extent as if he or she had affixed his or her signature in person.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2072; 1965 c 7 s 35.36.050. Prior: 1929 c 212 s 3; RRS s 9005-7.]